Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 2859XS (3) 91 jda/jh S.F. 485 Section 1. Section 257.11B, subsection 1, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) âQualified educational expensesâ includes tuition 3 and fees at a nonpublic school that is in compliance with 4 subsection 12 , textbooks, fees or payments for educational 5 therapies, including tutoring or cognitive skills training, 6 curriculum fees, software, and materials for a course of 7 study for a specific subject matter or grade level, tuition 8 or fees for nonpublic online education programs, tuition for 9 vocational and life skills education approved by the department 10 of education, education materials and services for pupils with 11 disabilities from an accredited provider, including the cost of 12 paraprofessionals and assistants who are trained in accordance 13 with state law, standardized test fees, and advanced placement 14 examinations or examinations related to postsecondary education 15 admission or credentialing. 16 Sec. 2. Section 257.11B, subsection 10, paragraph a, Code 17 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 a. This section shall not be construed to authorize the 19 state or any political subdivision of the state to exercise 20 authority over any nonpublic school or construed to require a 21 nonpublic school to modify its academic standards for admission 22 or educational program in order to receive payment from a 23 parent or guardian using funds from a pupilâs account in the 24 education savings account fund. 25 Sec. 3. Section 257.11B, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 26 following new subsection: 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 12. A nonpublic school shall not receive 28 tuition payments from parents or guardians whose students 29 are participating in the education savings account program 30 unless the nonpublic school satisfies all of the following 31 requirements: 32 a. The governing body of the nonpublic school must adhere to 33 the accountability and transparency requirements applicable to 34 the boards of directors of school districts in the same manner 35 -1- LSB 2859XS (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 3 S.F. 485 as the boards of directors of school districts. 1 b. The nonpublic school must adhere to the data reporting 2 requirements applicable to school districts in the same manner 3 as a school district. 4 c. The nonpublic school must adhere to the accreditation 5 standards applicable to school districts that are currently 6 accredited by the department of education, including standards 7 related to courses offered and taught by the nonpublic school, 8 in the same manner as a school district. 9 d. The nonpublic school must adhere to the teacher 10 employment and teacher licensing requirements applicable to 11 school districts in the same manner as a school district. 12